Washington statutes.
RCW 18.205.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agency" means (a) a community behavioral health agency or facility operated, licensed, or certified by the state of Washington; (b) a federally recognized Indian tribe located within the state; (c) a county; (d) a federally qualified health center; or (e) a hospital.

(2) "Certification" means a voluntary process recognizing an individual who qualifies by examination and meets established educational prerequisites, and which protects the title of practice.

(3) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105.

(4) "Committee" means the substance use disorder professional certification advisory committee established under this chapter.

(5) "Core competencies of substance use disorder counseling" means competency in the nationally recognized knowledge, skills, and attitudes of professional practice, including assessment and diagnosis of substance use disorders, substance use disorder treatment planning and referral, patient and family education in the disease of substance use disorders, individual and group counseling, relapse prevention counseling, and case management, all oriented to assist individuals with substance use disorder in their recovery.

(6) "Counseling" means employing any therapeutic techniques including, but not limited to, social work, mental health counseling, marriage and family therapy, and hypnotherapy, for a fee, that offer, assist, or attempt to assist an individual or individuals in the amelioration or adjustment of mental, emotional, or behavioral problems, and includes therapeutic techniques to achieve sensitivity and awareness of self and others and the development of human potential. For the purposes of this chapter, nothing may be construed to imply that the practice of hypnotherapy is necessarily limited to counseling.

(7) "Department" means the department of health.

(8) "Health profession" means a profession providing health services regulated under the laws of this state.

(9) "Recovery" means a process of change through which individuals improve their health and wellness, live self-directed lives, and strive to reach their full potential. Recovery often involves achieving remission from active substance use disorder.

(10) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

(11) "Substance use disorder counseling" means employing the core competencies of substance use disorder counseling to assist or attempt to assist individuals with substance use disorder in their recovery.

(12) "Substance use disorder professional" means an individual certified in substance use disorder counseling under this chapter.

(13) "Substance use disorder professional trainee" means an individual working toward the education and experience requirements for certification as a substance use disorder professional.

[ 2019 c 444 s 2; 2008 c 135 s 15; 1998 c 243 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Effective date—2008 c 135 ss 1, 2, 7-9, and 11-19: See note following RCW 18.19.020.